Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,173,299 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Mortuary
and Cemetery Board.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $812,660
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $490,830
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $900,268
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Board of Medical Imag-
ing.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $626,713
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the State Board of Examin-
ers for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $990,407
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5523 (SB 5523-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate May 10, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5523 (SB 5523-A) Page 2